Utah statutes.
63A-3-403.   Utah Transparency Advisory Board -- Creation -- Membership --
Duties.
(1)  There is created within the division the Utah Transparency Advisory Board
comprised of members knowledgeable about public finance or providing public
access to public financial information as follows:
(a)  one member designated by the director of the Division of Finance;
(b)  one member designated by the director of the Governor's Office of
Planning and Budget;
(c)  one member appointed by the governor on advice from the Judicial Council,
who shall serve until June 30, 2009;
(d)  one member appointed by the governor on advice from the Legislative
Fiscal Analyst;
(e)  one member of the Senate, appointed by the governor on advice from the
president of the Senate;
(f)  one member of the House of Representatives, appointed by the governor on
advice from the speaker of the House of Representatives;
(g)  one member designated by the director of the Department of Technology
Services;
(h)  one member appointed by the governor from a state institution of higher
education, who shall serve for one year beginning on July 1, 2009 and ending
on June 30, 2010; and
(i)  three additional members appointed by the governor, who shall each serve
one-year terms as follows:
(i)  for the term beginning on July 1, 2009 and ending on June 30, 2010,
represent the following entities:
(A)  a school district;
(B)  a charter school; and
(C)  a public transit district created under Title 17B, Chapter 2a, Part 8,
Public Transit District Act; and
(ii)  for the term beginning on July 1, 2010 and ending on June 30, 2011,
represent the following entities:
(A)  a county;
(B)  a municipality; and
(C) (I)  a local district under Title 17B, Limited Purpose Local Government
Entities - Local Districts, that is not a public transit district created
under Title 17B, Chapter 2a, Part 8, Public Transit District Act; or
(II)  a special service district under Title 17D, Chapter 1, Special Service
District Act.
(2)  The board shall:
(a)  advise the division on matters related to the implementation and
administration of this part;
(b)  develop plans, make recommendations, and assist in implementing the
provisions of this part;
(c)  determine what public financial information shall be provided by
participating state and local entities, provided that the public financial
information:
(i)  only includes records that:
(A)  are classified as public under Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records
Access and Management Act;
(B)  are an accounting of monies, funds, accounts, bonds, loans, expenditures,
or revenues, regardless of the source; and
(C)  are owned, held, or administered by the participating state or local
entity that is required to provide the record; and
(ii)  is of the type or nature that should be accessible to the public via a
website based on considerations of:
(A)  the cost effectiveness of providing the information;
(B)  the value of providing the information to the public; and
(C)  privacy and security considerations;
(d)  evaluate the cost effectiveness of implementing specific information
resources and features on the website;
(e)  establish size or budget thresholds to identify those local entities that
qualify as participating local entities as defined in this part, giving
special consideration to the budget and resource limitations of an entity with
a current annual budget of less than $10,000,000;
(f)  require participating local entities to provide public financial
information in accordance with the requirements of this part, with a specified
content, reporting frequency, and form;
(g)  require a participating local entity's website to be accessible by link
or other direct route from the Utah Public Finance Website if the
participating local entity does not use the Utah Public Finance Website; and
(h)  determine the search methods and the search criteria that shall be made
available to the public as part of a website used by a participating local
entity under the requirements of this part, which criteria may include:
(i)  fiscal year;
(ii)  expenditure type;
(iii)  name of the agency;
(iv)  payee;
(v)  date; and
(vi)  amount.
(3)  The board shall annually elect a chair and a vice chair from its members.
(4) (a)  Except for a member appointed under Subsections (1)(c) and (h), each
member shall serve a two-year term.
(b)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement
shall be appointed for the remainder of the unexpired term.
(5)  The board shall meet as it determines necessary to accomplish its duties.
(6)  Reasonable notice shall be given to each member of the board before any
meeting.
(7)  A majority of the board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of
business.
(8) (a) (i)  Members who are not government employees shall receive no
compensation or benefits for their services, but may receive per diem and
expenses incurred in the performance of the member's official duties at the
rates established by the Division of Finance under Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
(ii)  Members may decline to receive per diem and expenses for their service.
(b) (i)  State government officer and employee members who do not receive
salary, per diem, or expenses from their agency for their service may receive
per diem and expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties
from the board at the rates established by the Division of Finance under
Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.
(ii)  State government officer and employee members may decline to receive per
diem and expenses for their service.
(c) (i)  Local government members who do not receive salary, per diem, or
expenses from the entity that they represent for their service may receive per
diem and expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties at the
rates established by the Division of Finance under Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
(ii)  Local government officer and employee members may decline to receive per
diem and expenses for their service.
